Arkansas, session 2025, HB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-58-207(e), concerning prohibited acts
under the Arkansas Egg Marketing Act of 1969, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, eggs
Eggs in retail shall not be removed from the immediate container in which the
eggs were received and placed into a different container by the retailer.
(2) Eggs in retail may be removed from the immediate container
in which the eggs were received and placed into a different container by the
retailer if eggs used to replace missing or broken eggs:
(A) Are of the same packer as the missing or broken eggs,
as evidenced by the license number printed or stamped on the carton or
container;
(B) Are of the same grade and size as the missing or
broken eggs, as evidenced by the label on the carton or container;
(C) Have the same expiration date, lot code, or Julian
date as the missing or broken eggs, as evidenced by the label or stamp on the
*JMB263*
02-24-2025 10:08:30 JMB263

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 HB1279
carton or container;
(D) Are from the same brand as the missing or broken eggs,
as evidenced by the label; and
(E) Are visibly clean with no prominent stains, adhering
dirt, debris, fecal matter, or other foreign material.

/s/Lynch





























02-24-2025 10:08:30 JMB263